Hawaii statutes.
[PART IV.]
AQUATIC MITIGATION BANKS

[§187A-41] Aquatic mitigation banking. The
department is authorized to establish and operate aquatic mitigation banks, the
purpose of which shall be to restore, create, enhance, or preserve aquatic
habitats or resources as compensatory mitigation where a person is required to
provide compensatory mitigation prospectively and the use of banked mitigation
is approved by the agency requiring mitigation, or for past damages to aquatic
habitats or resources. [L 2016, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next